Tennessee statutes. Title 65 Public Utilities and Carriers
Chapter 24

Electric Membership Corporations
[Repealed]

65-24-101 — 65-24-125. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 24, §§ 65-24-101 — 65-24-125 (Acts 1937, ch. 231, § 1-24; 1939, ch. 132, §§ 1, 2; 1939, ch. 227, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 3708.65-3708.89; Williams, §§ 3708.69-3708.92, 3708.95a; Acts 1980, ch. 601, § 23; 1980, ch. 756, § 4; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 65-2401 — 65-2425), concerning electric membership corporations, was repealed by Acts 1988, ch. 689, § 5.